Colorado, session 2026A, SB043.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 18-12-118 as
follows:
18-12-118. Unlawful purchase or sale of a firearm barrel -
penalty - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "FAMILY MEMBER" MEANS:
(I) A PERSON RELATED BY BLOOD, MARRIAGE, OR ADOPTION;
(II) A PERSON WHO HAS A CHILD IN COMMON WITH ANOTHER
PERSON;
(III) A PERSON WHO REGULARLY RESIDES OR REGULARLY RESIDED
WITH ANOTHER PERSON WITHIN THE LAST SIX MONTHS;
(IV) A DOMESTIC PARTNER;
(V) A PERSON WHO HAS A BIOLOGICAL OR LEGAL PARENT-CHILD
RELATIONSHIP WITH ANOTHER PERSON, INCLUDING STEPPARENTS AND
STEPCHILDREN AND GRANDPARENTS AND GRANDCHILDREN;
(VI) A PERSON WHO IS ACTING OR HAS ACTED AS ANOTHER
PERSON'S LEGAL GUARDIAN; AND
(VII) A PERSON IN ANY OTHER RELATIONSHIP DESCRIBED IN
-2- 043

SECTION 18-6-800.3 (2) WITH ANOTHER PERSON.
(b) "FIREARM BARREL" MEANS THE TUBE THROUGH WHICH A
PROJECTILE OR SHOT CHARGE IS FIRED. A FIREARM BARREL INCLUDES ANY
FORGING, CASTING, PRINTING, EXTRUSION, MACHINED BODY, OR SIMILAR
ARTICLE THAT HAS REACHED A STAGE IN MANUFACTURE WHERE IT MAY
READILY BE COMPLETED, ASSEMBLED, OR CONVERTED TO BE USED AS A
FIREARM BARREL, OR THAT IS MARKETED OR SOLD TO THE PUBLIC TO
BECOME OR BE USED AS A FIREARM BARREL ONCE COMPLETED,
ASSEMBLED, OR CONVERTED. A FIREARM BARREL MAY HAVE A RIFLED OR
SMOOTH BORE.
(c) "FIREARM BARREL" DOES NOT INCLUDE A FIREARM BARREL
THAT IS PERMANENTLY ATTACHED OR AFFIXED TO A FIREARM.
(2) (a) IT IS UNLAWFUL FOR A PERSON TO SELL OR TRANSFER A
FIREARM BARREL, UNLESS THE PERSON SELLING OR TRANSFERRING THE
FIREARM BARREL IS A FEDERALLY LICENSED FIREARM DEALER AND THE
SALE OR TRANSFER OCCURS IN PERSON.
(b) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SUBSECTION (2) COMMITS
UNLAWFUL SALE OF A FIREARM BARREL. UNLAWFUL SALE OF A FIREARM
BARREL IS AN UNCLASSIFIED MISDEMEANOR PUNISHABLE, UPON
CONVICTION THEREOF, BY A FINE OF NOT MORE THAN FIVE HUNDRED
DOLLARS AND THIRTY DAYS IMPRISONMENT IN THE COUNTY JAIL; EXCEPT
THAT A SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE IS A CLASS 2 MISDEMEANOR.
(3) (a) IT IS UNLAWFUL FOR A PERSON WHO IS NOT A FEDERALLY
LICENSED FIREARM DEALER TO POSSESS A FIREARM BARREL WITH THE
INTENT TO SELL OR TRANSFER, OR WITH THE INTENT TO OFFER TO SELL OR
TRANSFER, THE FIREARM BARREL IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(b) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SUBSECTION (3) COMMITS
-3- 043

UNLAWFUL POSSESSION WITH INTENT TO SELL OR OFFER TO SELL A
FIREARM BARREL. UNLAWFUL POSSESSION WITH INTENT TO SELL OR OFFER
TO SELL A FIREARM BARREL IS AN UNCLASSIFIED MISDEMEANOR
PUNISHABLE, UPON CONVICTION THEREOF, BY A FINE OF NOT MORE THAN
FIVE HUNDRED DOLLARS AND THIRTY DAYS IMPRISONMENT IN THE COUNTY
JAIL; EXCEPT THAT A SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE IS A CLASS 2
MISDEMEANOR.
(4) (a) A PERSON MAY PURCHASE OR OTHERWISE ACQUIRE A
FIREARM BARREL FROM A FEDERALLY LICENSED FIREARM DEALER ONLY IF:
(I) THEY ARE AT LEAST EIGHTEEN YEARS OLD; AND
(II) THEY ARE NOT PROHIBITED FROM POSSESSING, RECEIVING,
OWNING, OR PURCHASING A FIREARM UNDER STATE OR FEDERAL LAW.
(b) A PERSON WHO PURCHASES A FIREARM BARREL IN VIOLATION
OF THIS SUBSECTION (4) COMMITS UNLAWFUL PURCHASE OF A FIREARM
BARREL. UNLAWFUL PURCHASE OF A FIREARM BARREL IS A CIVIL
INFRACTION.
(5) A FEDERALLY LICENSED FIREARM DEALER SHALL LEGIBLY
RECORD THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION PERTAINING TO THE SALE OR
TRANSFER OF A FIREARM BARREL ON A FORM TO BE PRESCRIBED BY THE
COLORADO BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION:
(a) THE DATE OF THE SALE OR TRANSFER;
(b) THE PURCHASER'S OR TRANSFEREE'S DRIVER'S LICENSE NUMBER
OR OTHER OFFICIAL GOVERNMENT IDENTIFICATION NUMBER AND THE
STATE OR TERRITORY WHERE IT WAS ISSUED;
(c) THE MAKE, MODEL, AND CALIBER OF THE FIREARM WHICH THE
FIREARM BARREL IS DESIGNED FOR OR USED IN;
(d) THE PURCHASER'S OR TRANSFEREE'S FULL LEGAL NAME;
-4- 043

(e) THE FULL LEGAL NAME OF THE EMPLOYEE WHO PROCESSED THE
SALE OR TRANSFER OF THE FIREARM BARREL;
(f) THE PURCHASER'S OR TRANSFEREE'S FULL RESIDENTIAL
ADDRESS AND TELEPHONE NUMBER; AND
(g) THE PURCHASER'S OR TRANSFEREE'S DATE OF BIRTH.
(6) A FEDERALLY LICENSED FIREARM DEALER SHALL RETAIN THE
RECORDS REQUIRED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION FOR AT LEAST FIVE
YEARS. A DEALER THAT DOES NOT RETAIN THEIR RECORDS PURSUANT TO
THIS SUBSECTION (6) IS SUBJECT TO THE PENALTIES DESCRIBED IN SECTION
18-12-401.5 (7)(a).
(7) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(a) THE SALE OR TRANSFER OF A FIREARM BARREL TO A FEDERAL,
STATE, OR LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY;
(b) THE SALE OR TRANSFER OF A FIREARM BARREL TO A FEDERAL
FIREARMS LICENSEE;
(c) THE SALE OR TRANSFER OF A FIREARM BARREL TO THE UNITED
STATES MILITARY;
(d) THE SALE OR TRANSFER OF A FIREARM BARREL TO A PERSON
WHO, IN THE SAME TRANSACTION, IS SEPARATELY PURCHASING A FIREARM
AND UNDERGOING A FEDERAL AND STATE FIREARM BACKGROUND CHECK
PURSUANT TO 18 U.S.C. SEC. 922 (t) AND SECTION 18-12-112.5;
(e) THE SALE OR TRANSFER OF A FIREARM BARREL TO A FEDERALLY
LICENSED COLLECTOR WHO IS ACQUIRING OR BEING LOANED A FIREARM
BARREL OF A FIREARM THAT IS A CURIO OR RELIC, AS DEFINED IN 27 CFR
478.11;
(f) A TRANSFER OF A FIREARM BARREL THAT OCCURS BY
OPERATION OF LAW OR BECAUSE OF THE DEATH OF A PERSON FOR WHOM
-5- 043

THE PROSPECTIVE TRANSFEROR IS AN EXECUTOR OR ADMINISTRATOR OF
AN ESTATE OR A TRUSTEE OF A TRUST CREATED IN A WILL. A TRANSFER OR
SALE OF A FIREARM BARREL BY AN EXECUTOR OR ADMINISTRATOR OF AN
ESTATE OR A TRUSTEE OF A TRUST CREATED IN A WILL MUST BE
CONDUCTED BY A FEDERALLY LICENSED FIREARM DEALER AND IS SUBJECT
TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(g) THE SALE OR OTHER TRANSFER OF OWNERSHIP OF A FIREARM
BARREL IF THE SALE OR OTHER TRANSFER OF OWNERSHIP IS TO AN
AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF A CITY, CITY AND COUNTY, COUNTY,
STATE, OR THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, AND THE ENTITY IS ACQUIRING THE
FIREARM BARREL AS PART OF AN AUTHORIZED VOLUNTARY PROGRAM IN
WHICH THE ENTITY IS BUYING OR RECEIVING WEAPONS FROM A PRIVATE
INDIVIDUAL; AND
(h) THE SALE OR TRANSFER OF A FIREARM BARREL THAT OCCURS
BETWEEN FAMILY MEMBERS.
(8) THE COLORADO BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION SHALL CREATE A
FORM FOR RETAIL RECORD KEEPING PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-401.5, amend
(7)(a) introductory portion as follows:
18-12-401.5. Permit required - issuing agency - cash fund -
inspections - penalty - report - rules - repeal.
(7) (a) Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, if the
department finds that a dealer failed to post the required notice or make
a report concerning unlawful purchases in violation of section 18-12-111;
FAILED TO MAKE A RECORD REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SECTION 18-12-118;
failed to make a record required pursuant to section 18-12-402;
transferred a firearm without a locking device or failed to post the
-6- 043

required notice concerning locking devices, in violation of section
18-12-405; failed to comply with any of the requirements of section
18-12-406; failed to comply with any of the requirements of section
29-11.7-105 (5); violated any other provision of this article 12 or any
other state or local law concerning the sale of firearms; or violated any
federal law or rule concerning the sale of firearms or firearm components
for which the penalty includes potential revocation of the person's federal
firearms license, the department shall:
SECTION 3. Effective date - applicability. This act takes effect
July 1, 2026, and applies to offenses committed on or after said date.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-7- 043